Louisiana, session 2026, SB54.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:563(8) and 583(C)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§563. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following words have the following meanings:
* * *
(8)(a) "Esthetics" means engaging in any one or a combination of the
following practices: massaging the face or neck of a person, dyeing or trimming
eyebrows, applying natural or artificial enhancements to eyelashes, hair removal by
cosmetic preparations, threading, waxing, or other similar means, stimulating,
cleansing, or beautifying the face, neck, arms, bust, upper body, legs, or feet of a
person by any method with the aid of the hands or of any mechanical or electrical
apparatus, including micro-dermabrasion, epidermabrasion, or particle exfoliation
using equipment and methodology approved by the board or by the use of a cosmetic
preparation; however, esthetics shall not include the diagnosis, treatment, or therapy
of any dermatological condition, or the process of removing hair known as
"electrolysis".
(b) An esthetician may engage in blow drying hair services if it is in
combination with practices pursuant to Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
* * *
§583. Qualifications for certificate as a registered teacher; continuing education
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 54 ENROLLED
C. In addition to the requirements set forth in Subsection B of this Section,
a person shall also meet the following requirements in order to obtain a certificate
of registration as a registered teacher of cosmetology, esthetics, or manicuring:
(1) To obtain a certificate as a registered teacher of cosmetology, a person
shall possess a cosmetology certificate, have been actively engaged in the practice
of cosmetology for at least twelve months prior to beginning the instructor's course,
and have successfully passed the examination prescribed by the board for
certification as a teacher of cosmetology.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.